Nebraska, session 109, LB941.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Franchise has the same meaning as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1;
(b) Franchisee has the same meaning as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1; and
(c) Franchisor has the same meaning as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
franchisor shall not be considered an employer of a franchisee or a
franchisee's employees.
(3)(a) A franchisor shall be considered an employer of a franchisee
or a franchisee's employees if the franchisor exercises direct and
immediate control over one or more essential terms or conditions of
employment of the franchisee or franchisee's employees.
(b) A franchisor exercises direct and immediate control over one or
more essential terms or conditions of employment of a franchisee or
franchisee's employees if the franchisor:
(i) Determines the wage rate, salary, or other rate of pay that is
paid to a franchisee's individual employees or job classifications;
(ii) Determines the fringe benefits to be provided or offered to a
franchisee's employees. A franchisor does not exercise direct and
immediate control by permitting a franchisee under an arm's length
contract to participate in such franchisor's benefits plan, including a
health benefits plan, pension plan, and tuition assistance;
(iii) Determines work schedules or the work hours of a franchisee's
employees. A franchisor does not exercise direct and immediate control
over scheduling by establishing a franchisee's operating hours or by
establishing minimum staffing levels to satisfy the franchise's service
standards;
(iv) Determines which particular employees will be hired or which
employees will not be hired. A franchisor does not exercise direct and
immediate control by encouraging or recommending changes in staffing
levels or by setting minimal recruiting or hiring standards, including
those required by law for consumer or employee safety or for brand
-2-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
protection;
(v) Decides to terminate the employment of, suspend, or discipline a
franchisee's employee. A franchisor does not exercise direct and
immediate control by bringing misconduct or poor performance to the
attention of a franchisee, by expressing a negative opinion of a
franchisee's employee, or by setting minimal standards of performance or
conduct;
(vi) Consistently and directly instructs a franchisee's employees on
how to perform work or by issuing employee performance appraisals. A
franchisor does not exercise direct and immediate control if the
franchisor (A) offers instructions that are limited and routine, (B) sets
brand standards for the performance of work, (C) offers training
materials for a franchisee to use to train such franchisee's employees,
(D) establishes minimum training requirements for a franchisee's
employees, or (E) provides operational support, guidance, and assistance
to the franchisee to promote and protect the brand's goodwill and quality
of products and services provided to a consumer; or
(vii) Assigns particular employees of a franchisee to individual
work schedules, positions, and tasks. A franchisor does not exercise
direct and immediate control by offering resources and tools for a
franchisee to consider using to direct such franchisee's employees'
individual work schedule, position, or tasks.
Sec. 2. Section 48-114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-114 (1) The following shall constitute employers subject to the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act: (a) (1) The state and every
governmental agency created by it; and (b) (2) every person, firm, or
corporation, including any public service corporation, who is engaged in
any trade, occupation, business, or profession as described in section
48-106, and who has any person in service under any contract of hire,
express or implied, oral or written.
-3-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
(2) A franchisor shall not be considered an employer subject to the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act unless such franchisor is considered
an employer under section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. Section 48-116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-116 (1) Any person, firm, or corporation creating or carrying
into operation any scheme, artifice, or device to enable him or her,
them, or it to execute work without being responsible to the workers for
the provisions of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall be
included in the term employer, and with the immediate employer shall be
jointly and severally liable to pay the compensation herein provided for
and be subject to all the provisions of such act.
(2) This section, however, shall not be construed as applying to (a)
an owner who lets a contract to a contractor in good faith, or a
contractor, who, in good faith, lets to a subcontractor a portion of his
or her contract, if the owner or principal contractor, as the case may
be, requires the contractor or subcontractor, respectively, to procure a
policy or policies of insurance from an insurance company licensed to
write such insurance in this state, which policy or policies of insurance
shall guarantee payment of compensation according to the Nebraska
Workers' Compensation Act to injured workers or (b) a franchisor except
if such franchisor is considered an employer under section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. Section 48-603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-603 As used in the Employment Security Law, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, employer shall mean:
(1) Any individual or type of organization, including any
partnership, limited liability company, association, trust, estate,
joint-stock company, insurance company or corporation, whether domestic
or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor
thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person, which for some
-4-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
portion of a day but not necessarily simultaneously in each of twenty
different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks are or were
consecutive, within either the current or preceding calendar year, and
for the purpose of this definition, if any week includes both December 31
and January 1, the days up to January 1 shall be deemed one calendar week
and the days beginning January 1 another such week, has or had in
employment one or more individuals, irrespective of whether the same
individuals are or were employed in each such day; all individuals
performing services for any employer of any person in this state, who
maintains two or more separate establishments within this state, shall be
deemed to be employed by a single employer; any artifice or device,
including any contract or subcontract, by an employer for the performance
of work, which is a part of such employer's usual trade, occupation,
profession, or business, entered into for the purpose or with the intent
of evading the application of this section to such employer, is hereby
prohibited and declared to be unlawful;
(2) Any employer of any person in this state who in any calendar
quarter in either the current or preceding calendar year has paid wages
for employment in the total sum of fifteen hundred dollars or more;
(3) Any individual or employer of any person in this state which
acquired the organization, trade, or business, or substantially all the
assets thereof, of another employer which, at the time of such
acquisition, was an employer subject to the Employment Security Law;
(4) Any employer of any person in this state, which acquired the
organization, trade, or business, or substantially all the assets
thereof, of another employer of any person in this state, not an employer
subject to such law, and which, if subsequent to such acquisition it were
treated as a single unit with such other employer, would be an employer
under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section;
(5) Any employer of any person in this state which, having become an
employer under any provision of the Employment Security Law and which has
-5-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
not, under section 48-661, ceased to be an employer subject to such law;
(6) For the effective period of its election pursuant to section
48-661, any other employer of any person in this state who has elected to
become fully subject to the Employment Security Law;
(7) Any employer of any person in this state not an employer by
reason of any other subdivision of this section (a) for which services in
employment are or were performed with respect to which such employer is
liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for
contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment compensation
fund; or (b) which, as a condition for approval of the Employment
Security Law for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, is required, pursuant to such act, to be an
employer under the Employment Security Law;
(8) The state or any political subdivision thereof and any
instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing;
(9) Any organization for which service in employment as defined in
subdivision (4)(b) of section 48-604 is performed;
(10) Any individual or employing unit for which service in
employment as defined in subdivision (4)(c) of section 48-604 is
performed;
(11) Any individual or employing unit for which service in
employment as defined in subdivision (4)(d) of section 48-604 is
performed; and
(12)(a) In determining whether or not an employing unit for which
service other than domestic service is also performed is an employer
under subdivision (1) or (10) of this section, the wages earned or the
employment of an employee performing domestic service shall not be taken
into account; and
(b) In determining whether or not an employing unit for which
agricultural labor is also performed is an employer under subdivision
(11) of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee
-6-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
performing services in agricultural labor shall not be taken into
account. If an employing unit is determined an employer of agricultural
labor, such employing unit shall be determined an employer for the
purposes of subdivision (1) of this section; and .
(13) A franchisor only if such franchisor is considered an employer
under section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. Section 48-1102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1102 For purposes of the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Person shall include one or more individuals, labor unions,
partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, corporations,
legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts,
unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, or
receivers;
(2) Employer shall mean a person engaged in an industry who has
fifteen or more employees for each working day in each of twenty or more
calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, any agent of
such a person, and any party whose business is financed in whole or in
part under the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act regardless of
the number of employees and shall include the State of Nebraska,
governmental agencies, and political subdivisions, but such term shall
not include (a) the United States, a corporation wholly owned by the
government of the United States, or an Indian tribe, or (b) a bona fide
private membership club, other than a labor organization, which is exempt
from taxation under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, or (c) a
franchisor if such franchisor is not considered an employer under section
1 of this act;
(3) Labor organization shall mean any organization which exists
wholly or in part for one or more of the following purposes: Collective
bargaining; dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms, or
-7-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
conditions of employment; or mutual aid or protection in relation to
employment;
(4) Employment agency shall mean any person regularly undertaking
with or without compensation to procure employees for an employer or to
procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer and shall
include an agent of such a person but shall not include an agency of the
United States, except that such term shall include the United States
Employment Service and the system of state and local employment services
receiving federal assistance;
(5) Covered entity shall mean an employer, an employment agency, a
labor organization, or a joint labor-management committee;
(6) Privileges of employment shall mean terms and conditions of any
employer-employee relationship, opportunities for advancement of
employees, and plant conveniences;
(7) Employee shall mean an individual employed by an employer;
(8) Commission shall mean the Equal Opportunity Commission;
(9) Disability shall mean (a) a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of such
individual, (b) a record of such an impairment, or (c) being regarded as
having such an impairment. Disability shall not include homosexuality,
bisexuality, transvestism, transsexualism, pedophilia, exhibitionism,
voyeurism, gender-identity disorders not resulting in physical
impairments, other sexual behavior disorders, problem gambling,
kleptomania, pyromania, or psychoactive substance use disorders resulting
from current illegal use of drugs;
(10)(a) Qualified individual with a disability shall mean an
individual with a disability who, with or without reasonable
accommodation, can perform the essential functions of the employment
position that such individual holds or desires. Consideration shall be
given to the employer's judgment as to what functions of a job are
essential, and if an employer has prepared a written description before
-8-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this description
shall be considered evidence of the essential functions of the job;
(b) Qualified individual with a disability shall not include any
employee or applicant who is currently engaged in the illegal use of
drugs when the covered entity acts on the basis of such use; and
(c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to exclude as a
qualified individual with a disability an individual who:
(i) Has successfully completed a supervised drug rehabilitation
program or otherwise been rehabilitated successfully and is no longer
engaging in the illegal use of drugs;
(ii) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation program and is
no longer engaging in such use; or
(iii) Is erroneously regarded as engaging in such use but is not
engaging in such use;
(11) Reasonable accommodation, with respect to disability, shall
include making existing facilities used by employees readily accessible
to and usable by individuals with disabilities, job restructuring, part-
time or modified work schedules, reassignment to a vacant position,
acquisition or modification of equipment or devices, appropriate
adjustment or modification of examinations, training manuals, or
policies, the provision of qualified readers or interpreters, and other
similar accommodations for individuals with disabilities. Reasonable
accommodation, with respect to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions, shall include acquisition of equipment for sitting, more
frequent or longer breaks, periodic rest, assistance with manual labor,
job restructuring, light-duty assignments, modified work schedules,
temporary transfers to less strenuous or hazardous work, time off to
recover from childbirth, or break time and appropriate facilities for
breast-feeding or expressing breast milk. Reasonable accommodation shall
not include accommodations which the covered entity can demonstrate
require significant difficulty or expense thereby posing an undue
-9-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
hardship upon the covered entity. Factors to be considered in determining
whether an accommodation would pose an undue hardship shall include:
(a) The nature and the cost of the accommodation needed under the
Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act;
(b) The overall financial resources of the facility or facilities
involved in the provision of the reasonable accommodation, the number of
persons employed at such facility, the effect on expenses and resources,
or the impact otherwise of such accommodation upon the operation of the
facility;
(c) The overall financial resources of the covered entity, the
overall size of the business of a covered entity with respect to the
number of its employees, and the number, type, and location of its
facilities; and
(d) The type of operation or operations of the covered entity,
including the composition, structure, and functions of the work force of
such entity, and the geographic separateness and administrative or fiscal
relationship of the facility or facilities in question to the covered
entity;
(12) Marital status shall mean the status of a person whether
married or single;
(13) Because of sex or on the basis of sex shall include, but not be
limited to, because of or on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or
related medical conditions;
(14) Harass because of sex shall include making unwelcome sexual
advances, requesting sexual favors, and engaging in other verbal or
physical conduct of a sexual nature if (a) submission to such conduct is
made either explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of an
individual's employment, (b) submission to or rejection of such conduct
by an individual is used as the basis for employment decisions affecting
such individual, or (c) such conduct has the purpose or effect of
unreasonably interfering with an individual's work performance or
-10-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive working environment;
(15) Unlawful under federal law or the laws of this state shall mean
acting contrary to or in defiance of the law or disobeying or
disregarding the law;
(16) Drug shall mean a controlled substance as defined in section
28-401;
(17) Illegal use of drugs shall mean the use of drugs, the
possession or distribution of which is unlawful under the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, but shall not include the use of a drug taken
under supervision by a licensed health care professional or any other use
authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or other provisions
of state law;
(18) Individual who is pregnant, who has given birth, or who has a
related medical condition shall mean an individual with a known
limitation who, with or without reasonable accommodation, can perform the
essential functions of the employment position that such individual
holds, desires, or may be temporarily assigned to. Consideration shall be
given to the employer's judgment as to what functions of a job are
essential, and if an employer has prepared a written description before
advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this description
shall be considered evidence of the essential functions of the job;
(19) Race is inclusive of characteristics such as skin color, hair
texture, and protective hairstyles; and
(20) Protective hairstyles includes braids, locks, and twists.
Sec. 6. Section 48-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1202 For purposes of the Wage and Hour Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Employ shall include to permit to work;
(2) Employer shall include any individual, partnership, limited
liability company, association, corporation, business trust, legal
-11-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
representative, or organized group of persons employing four or more
employees at any one time except for seasonal employment of not more than
twenty weeks in any calendar year, acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of an employer in relation to an employee, but shall not include
(a) the United States, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or
(b) a franchisor if such franchisor is not considered an employer under
section 1 of this act;
(3) Employee shall include any individual employed by any employer
but shall not include:
(a) Any individual employed in agriculture;
(b) Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in or about a private
home;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or as a superintendent or
supervisor;
(d) Any individual employed by the United States or by the state or
any political subdivision thereof;
(e) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization when the employer-
employee relationship does not in fact exist or when the services
rendered to such organization are on a voluntary basis;
(f) Apprentices and learners otherwise provided by law;
(g) Veterans in training under supervision of the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs;
(h) A child in the employment of his or her parent or a parent in
the employment of his or her child; or
(i) Any person who, directly or indirectly, is receiving any form of
federal, state, county, or local aid or welfare and who is physically or
mentally disabled and employed in a program of rehabilitation, who shall
receive a wage at a level consistent with his or her health, efficiency,
and general well-being;
-12-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
(4) Occupational classification shall mean a classification
established by the Dictionary of Occupational Titles prepared by the
United States Department of Labor; and
(5) Wages shall mean all remuneration for personal services,
including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all remunerations
in any medium other than cash.
Sec. 7. Section 48-1229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1229 For purposes of the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection
Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Employee means any individual permitted to work by an employer
pursuant to an employment relationship or who has contracted to sell the
goods or services of an employer and to be compensated by commission.
Services performed by an individual for an employer shall be deemed to be
employment, unless it is shown that (a) such individual has been and will
continue to be free from control or direction over the performance of
such services, both under his or her contract of service and in fact, (b)
such service is either outside the usual course of business for which
such service is performed or such service is performed outside of all the
places of business of the enterprise for which such service is performed,
and (c) such individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business. This subdivision
is not intended to be a codification of the common law and shall be
considered complete as written;
(2)(a) (2) Employer means the state or any individual, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint-stock company, trust,
corporation, political subdivision, or personal representative of the
estate of a deceased individual, or the receiver, trustee, or successor
thereof, within or without the state, employing any person within the
state as an employee. ;
(b) A franchisor shall not be considered an employer unless such
-13-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
franchisor is considered an employer under section 1 of this act;
(3) Federally insured financial institution means a state or
nationally chartered bank or a state or federally chartered savings and
loan association, savings bank, or credit union whose deposits are
insured by an agency of the United States Government;
(4) Fringe benefits includes sick and vacation leave plans,
disability income protection plans, retirement, pension, or profit-
sharing plans, health and accident benefit plans, and any other employee
benefit plans or benefit programs regardless of whether the employee
participates in such plans or programs;
(5) Payroll debit card means a stored-value card issued by or on
behalf of a federally insured financial institution that provides an
employee with immediate access for withdrawal or transfer of his or her
wages through a network of automatic teller machines. Payroll debit card
includes payroll debit cards, payroll cards, and paycards; and
(6) Wages means compensation for labor or services rendered by an
employee, including fringe benefits, when previously agreed to and
conditions stipulated have been met by the employee, whether the amount
is determined on a time, task, fee, commission, or other basis. Paid
leave, other than earned but unused vacation leave, provided as a fringe
benefit by the employer shall not be included in the wages due and
payable at the time of separation, unless the employer and the employee
or the employer and the collective-bargaining representative have
specifically agreed otherwise. Unless the employer and employee have
specifically agreed otherwise through a contract effective at the
commencement of employment or at least ninety days prior to separation,
whichever is later, wages includes commissions on all orders delivered
and all orders on file with the employer at the time of separation of
employment less any orders returned or canceled at the time suit is
filed.
Sec. 8. Section 48-1231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-14-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
amended to read:
48-1231 (1) An employee having a claim for wages which are not paid
within thirty days of the regular payday designated or agreed upon may
institute suit for such unpaid wages in the proper court. If an employee
establishes a claim and secures judgment on the claim, such employee
shall be entitled to recover the full amount of the judgment and all
costs of such suit, including reasonable attorney's fees. If the cause is
taken to an appellate court and the employee recovers a judgment, the
appellate court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to the employee.
If the employee fails to recover a judgment in excess of the amount that
may have been tendered within thirty days of the regular payday by an
employer, such employee shall not recover the attorney's fees provided by
this subsection. If the court finds that no reasonable dispute existed as
to the fact that wages were owed or as to the amount of such wages, the
court may order the employee to pay the employer's attorney's fees and
costs of the action as assessed by the court.
(2) If an employee works for an employer that is not subject to the
Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and such employee is aggrieved by a
violation of section 48-1235, the employee may bring a suit against such
employer in the proper court to recover the damages sustained by reason
of such violation. If an employee prevails in a suit brought pursuant to
this subsection, such employee shall be entitled to recover the full
amount of the judgment and all costs of such suit, including reasonable
attorney's fees. If the cause is taken to an appellate court and the
employee recovers a judgment, the appellate court shall award reasonable
attorney's fees to the employee.
(3) An employer who fails to furnish a wage statement under
subsection (2) of section 48-1230 shall be guilty of an infraction as
defined in section 29-431 and shall be subject to a fine pursuant to
section 29-436.
(4) If an employee institutes suit against an employer under
-15-

LB941 LB941
2026 2026
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, any citation that is issued
against such employer under section 48-1234 and that relates directly to
the facts in dispute shall be admitted into evidence unless specifically
excluded by the court. If a citation has been contested as described in
subsection (3) of section 48-1234, it shall not be admitted into evidence
under this subsection until after such contest has been resolved.
(5) A franchisor shall not be liable for wages owed by a franchisee
unless such franchisor is considered an employer under section 1 of this
act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 48-114, 48-116, 48-603, 48-1102, 48-1202,
48-1229, and 48-1231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-16-